North Dakota, session 69, HB1557.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. APPROPRIATION - DEPARTMENT OF WATER RESOURCES - LEGAL FEE
REIMBURSEMENT GRANTS - ONE-TIME FUNDING. There is appropriated out of any moneys
in the state water commissioner fund in the state treasury, not otherwise appropriated, the sum
of $221,993, or so much of the sum as may be necessary, to the department of water resources
for the purpose of providing grants to reimburse residents for legal fees associated with
watershed lawsuits heard by the North Dakota supreme court, for the biennium beginning
July 1, 2025, and ending June 30, 2027. This funding is considered a one-time funding item.
Page No. 1 25.1284.02000